District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.84

Voluntary dissolution proceedings — Filing of statement of revocation.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 215, ch. 269, § 84
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 85-254, § 21
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.84.
1981 Ed., § 29-384.
1973 Ed., § 29-930h.